Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.277

Consumer loan companies—When reports of condition are required.

Each consumer loan company licensee must submit call reports through the nationwide mortgage licensing system in a form and containing the information prescribed by the director or as deemed necessary by the nationwide mortgage licensing system.

The director's obligations or duties under chapter 62, Laws of 2018 are subject to section 21, chapter 62, Laws of 2018.

[ 2018 c 62 s 17; 2015 c 229 s 34; 2010 c 35 s 8; 2009 c 120 s 27.]

NOTES:

Findings—Declaration—2009 c 120: See note following RCW 31.04.015.